District of Columbia statutes.
2-1210.11

District liability prohibited.

The District of Columbia shall not be liable to a participating financial institution for payment of the principal, interest, or any late charges on a capital access loan made under this subchapter.

History

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-322, § 12, 57 DCR 12442

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 12 of Capital Access Program Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-598, November 17, 2010, 57 DCR 11018).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 12 of Capital Access Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-6, February 11, 2011, 58 DCR 1408).